Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 24. Virginia Health Club Act.

§ 59.1-294.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Virginia Health Club Act.”

History.
1984, c. 738; 2014, c. 459.

The numbers of §§ 59.1-294 through 59.1-310
were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1984 act having been 59.1-285 through 59.1-301.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “Health Club” for “Health Spa.”

§ 59.1-295.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to safeguard the public interest against fraud, deceit, and financial hardship, and to foster and encourage competition, fair dealing and prosperity in the field of health club services by prohibiting false and misleading
advertising, and dishonest, deceptive, and unscrupulous practices by which the public has been injured in connection with contracts for health club services.

History.
1984, c. 738; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” twice.

§ 59.1-296.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Automated external defibrillator” means a device that combines a heart monitor and defibrillator and (i) has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration; (ii) is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or
rapid ventricular tachycardia; (iii) is capable of determining, without intervention by an operator, whether defibrillation should be performed; and (iv) automatically charges and requests delivery of an electrical impulse to an individual’s
heart upon determining that defibrillation should be performed.

“Business day” means any day except a Sunday or a legal holiday.

“Buyer” means a natural person who enters into a health club contract.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or a member of his staff to whom he may delegate his duties under this chapter.

“Comparable alternate facility” means a health club facility that is reasonably of like kind, in nature and quality, to the health club facility originally contracted, whether such facility is in the same location but owned or operated by a different
health club or is at another location of the same health club.

“Contract price” means the sum of the initiation fee, if any, and all monthly fees except interest required by the health club contract.

“Facility” means a location where health club services are offered as designated in a health club contract.

“Health club” means any person, firm, corporation, organization, club or association whose primary purpose is to engage in the sale of memberships in a program consisting primarily of physical exercise with exercise machines or devices, or whose primary
purpose is to engage in the sale of the right or privilege to use exercise machines or devices. The term “health club” shall not include the following: (i) bona fide nonprofit organizations, including, but not limited to, the Young
Men’s Christian Association, Young Women’s Christian Association, or similar organizations whose functions as health clubs are only incidental to their overall functions and purposes; (ii) any private club owned and operated by its
members; (iii) any organization primarily operated for the purpose of teaching a particular form of self-defense such as judo or karate; (iv) any facility owned or operated by the United States; (v) any facility owned or operated by
the Commonwealth of Virginia or any of its political subdivisions; (vi) any nonprofit public or private school or institution of higher education; (vii) any club providing tennis or swimming facilities located in a residential planned
community or subdivision, developed in conjunction with the development of such community or subdivision, and deriving at least 80 percent of its membership from residents of such community or subdivision; and (viii) any facility owned
and operated by a private employer exclusively for the benefit of its employees, retirees, and family members and which facility is only incidental to the overall functions and purposes of the employer’s business and is operated on
a nonprofit basis.

“Health club contract” means an agreement whereby the buyer of health club services purchases, or becomes obligated to purchase, health club services.

“Health club services” means and includes services, privileges, or rights offered for sale or provided by a health club.

“Initiation fee” means a nonrecurring fee charged at or near the beginning of a health club membership, and includes all fees or charges not part of the monthly fee.

“Monthly fee” means the total consideration, including but not limited to, equipment or locker rental, credit check, finance, medical and dietary evaluation, class and training fees, and all other similar fees or charges and interest, but excluding any
initiation fee, to be paid by a buyer, divided by the total number of months of health club service use allowed by the buyer’s contract, including months or time periods called “free” or “bonus” months or time periods and such months
or time periods that are described in any other terms suggesting that they are provided free of charge, which months or time periods are given or contemplated when the contract is initially executed.

“Out of business” means the status of a facility that is permanently closed and for which there is no comparable alternate facility.

“Prepayment” means payment of any consideration for services or the use of facilities made prior to the day on which the services or facilities of the health club are fully open and available for regular use by the members.

“Relocation” means the provision of health club services by the health club that entered into the membership contract at a location other than that designated in the member’s contract.

History.
1984, c. 738; 1985, c. 585; 1986, c. 187; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 1991, c. 149; 1992, c. 102; 2003, c. 344; 2007, c. 683; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459; 2020, c. 628.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “institution of higher education” was substituted for “college or university” in the definition of “Health club” to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 344 inserted the definition of “Comparable alternate facility”; in the definition of “Health spa,” substituted “80” for “eighty”; and added the definition of “Relocation.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 683 inserted “the same location through another health spa or at” in the paragraph defining “Comparable alternate facility.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439, in the definition of “comparable alternate facility,” substituted “is reasonably” for “provides health spa services and facilities that are reasonably,” “health spa facility” for “services,” and “whether such facility is
in the same location but owned by a different health spa or is at another location of the same health” for “for at the same location through another health spa or at another location of the health spa”; added the definition of “facility”;
in the definition of “health spa,” rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “ ‘Health spa’ means and includes any person, firm, corporation, organization, club or association engaged in the sale of memberships in a program
of physical exercise, which included the use of one or more of a sauna, whirlpool, weight lifting room, massage, steam room, or exercising machine device, or engaged in the sale of the right or privilege to use exercise equipment or
facilities, such as a sauna, whirlpool, weight lifting room, massage, steam room or exercising machine or device”; and added the definition for “out of business.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section; inserted “or operated” in the definition of “Comparable alternate facility”; and substituted “time periods that” for “time periods which” in the definition
of “Monthly fee.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 628, in the introductory language, added “unless the context requires a different meaning”; and added the definition for “Automated external defibrillator.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 59.1-296.1.
Registration; fees.

It shall be unlawful for any health club to offer, advertise, or execute or cause to be executed by the buyer any health club contract in this Commonwealth unless each facility of the health club has been properly registered with the Commissioner at the
time of the offer, advertisement, sale or execution of a health club contract. The registration shall (i) disclose the address, ownership, date of first sales and date of first opening of the facility and such other information
as the Commissioner may require consistent with the purposes of this chapter, (ii) be renewed annually on July 1, and (iii) be accompanied by the appropriate registration fee per each annual registration in the amount indicated
below:

Click to viewFurther, it shall be accompanied by a late fee of $50 if the registration renewal is neither postmarked nor received on or before July 1. In the event that a club operates multiple facilities, a $50 late fee for the first facility and $25
for each additional facility shall accompany the registrations. For each successive 30 days after August 1, an additional $25 shall be added for each facility. Each separate facility where health club services are offered shall
be considered a separate facility and shall file a separate registration, even though the separate facilities are owned or operated by the same health club.

Any health club that sells a health club contract prior to registering pursuant to this section and, if required, submits the appropriate surety required by § 59.1-306 shall pay a late filing fee of $100 for each 30-day period the registration or surety
is late. This fee shall be in addition to all other penalties allowed by law.

A registration shall be amended within 21 days if there is a change in the information included in the registration.

All fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and shall be placed to the credit and special fund of the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to be used in the administration of this chapter.

Number of unexpired Registration fee contracts originally written for more than one month 0 to 250 $200 251 to 500 $300 501 to 2000 $700 2001 or more $800

History.
1985, c. 585; 1988, c. 13; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, substituted “each facility of the health spa has been properly registered with the Commissioner” for “the health spa,” deleted “has been properly registered with the Commissioner”
following “health spa contract,” substituted “facility” for “health spa,” in the second paragraph, substituted “spa operates” for “spa has,” “facilities” for “locations” twice, “facility” for “location” three times, “facility” for
“health spa” once, and substituted “health spa” for “owner” at the end; and made stylistic changes throughout.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” throughout the section; and substituted “club that” for “spa which” in subsection B.

§ 59.1-296.2.
Contracts sold on prepayment basis.

Each health club selling contracts or health club services on a prepayment basis shall notify the Commissioner of the proposed facility for which prepayments will be solicited and shall deposit all funds received from such prepayment contracts in an account
established in a financial institution authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth until the health club has commenced operations in the facility and the facility has remained open for a period of 30 days. The account shall
be established and maintained only in a financial institution that agrees in writing with the Commissioner to hold all funds deposited and not to release such funds until receipt of written authorization from the Commissioner.
The prepayment funds deposited will be eligible for withdrawal by the health club after the facility has been open and providing services pursuant to its health club contracts for 30 days and the Commissioner gives written authorization
for withdrawal.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any facility duly registered pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-296.1 for which a bond or letter of credit in the amount of $100,000 has been posted.

History.
1985, c. 585; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439 designated the existing provisions as subsections A and B and made related changes; in subsection A, substituted “facility” for “location of the spa” and inserted “in the facility” and “the facility” in the first sentence,
substituted “facility” for “health spa” in the last sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “facility” for “health spa” and “for which a bond” for “which has posted a bond,” inserted “has been posted” at the end; and made minor
stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section; and substituted “that” for “which” in the second sentence of subsection A.

§ 59.1-296.2:1.
Prepayment contracts; prohibited practices; relocation; refund.

No health club shall sell a health club contract on a prepayment basis without disclosing in the contract the date on which the facility shall open. The opening date shall not be later than 12 months from the signing of the contract.

No health club shall close or relocate any facility without first giving notice to the Commissioner and conspicuously posting a notice both within and outside each entrance to the facility being closed or relocated of the closing or relocation date. Such
notice shall be provided at least 30 days prior to the closing or relocation date. If a relocation is to occur, the Commissioner and the facility’s members shall be provided with the address of the specific new facility at the
time of this notice.

No health club shall knowingly and willfully make any false statement in any registration application, statement, report, or other disclosure required by this chapter.

No health club shall refuse or fail, after notice from the Commissioner, to produce for the Commissioner’s review any of the health club’s books or records required to be maintained by this chapter.

Unless it so discloses fully in 10-point bold-faced type or larger on the face of each health club contract, no health club shall sell any health club contract if any owner of the health club, regardless of the extent of his ownership, previously owned
in whole or in part a health club that closed for business any facility and failed to:

Refund all moneys due to holders of health club contracts; or

Provide comparable alternate facilities with another health club that agreed in writing to honor all provisions of the health club contracts or at another facility operated by the originally contracting health club.

No health club that has failed to provide the Commissioner the appropriate surety pursuant to § 59.1-306 shall sell a health club contract unless that contract contains a statement that reads as follows: “This club is not permitted, pursuant to the Virginia
Health Club Act, to accept any initiation fee in excess of $125 or any payment for more than the prorated monthly fee for the month when the contract is initially executed plus one full month in advance.”Such disclosure shall be
printed in 10-point bold-faced type or larger on the face of each contract.

History.
1990, cc. 392, 433; 1993, c. 686; 2003, c. 344; 2004, c. 988; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 344, in subsection A, substituted “later than 12” for “in excess of twelve”; in subsection B, deleted “selling health spa contracts” following “No health spa,” inserted “and conspicuously posting a notice both within and outside
each entrance to the health spa facility being closed or relocated,” substituted “30” for “thirty,” and inserted “and the health spa facility’s members”; in subsection C, deleted “or” following “application”; in subsection D, substituted
“the Commissioner’s” for “his,” and substituted “health spa’s” for “organization’s”; in subsection E, substituted “shall sell” for “may sell”; in subdivision E 2, substituted “alternate” for “alternative”; and in subsection F, substituted
“that has failed” for “failing” and “$75” for “seventy-five dollars.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 988 substituted “$125” for “$75” in the first paragraph of subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439, in subsection A, substituted “facility” for “health spa”; in subsection B, inserted “any facility,” substituted “facility” for “health spa,” deleted “health spa” preceding “facility’s members,” and substituted “facility”
for “location”; in subsection E, substituted “owner of the health spa” for “owner of the spa” and inserted “any facility”; in subdivision E 2, substituted “with another” for “at another” and added “or at another facility operated by
the originally contracting health spa”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section.

§ 59.1-296.2:2.
Automated external defibrillator required.

Each health club location shall have a working automated external defibrillator.

History.
2020, c. 628.

§ 59.1-296.3.
Initiation fees.

Whenever a refund is due a buyer, any initiation fee charged by a health club shall be prorated over the life of the contract or 12 months, whichever is greater.

History.
1985, c. 585; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” and “12” for “twelve.”

§ 59.1-297.
Right of cancellation.

Every health club contract for the sale of health club services may be cancelled under the following circumstances:

A buyer may cancel the contract without penalty within three business days of its making and, upon notice to the health club of the buyer’s intent to cancel, shall be entitled to receive a refund of all moneys paid under the contract.

A buyer may cancel the contract if the facility relocates or goes out of business and the health club fails to provide comparable alternate facilities within five driving miles of the location designated in the health club contract. Upon receipt of notice
of the buyer’s intent to cancel, the health club shall refund to the buyer funds paid or accepted in payment of the contract in an amount computed as prescribed in § 59.1-297.1.

The contract may be cancelled if the buyer dies or becomes physically unable to use a substantial portion of the services for 30 or more consecutive days. If the buyer becomes physically unable to use a substantial portion of the services for 30 or more
consecutive days and wishes to cancel his contract, he must provide the health club with a signed statement from his doctor, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner verifying that he is physically unable to use a substantial
portion of the health club services for 30 or more consecutive days. Upon receipt of notice of the buyer’s intent to cancel, the health club shall refund to the buyer funds paid or accepted in payment of the contract in
an amount computed as prescribed in § 59.1-297.1. In the case of disability, the health club may require the buyer to submit to a physical examination by a doctor, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner agreeable to
the buyer and the health club within 30 days of receipt of notice of the buyer’s intent to cancel. The cost of the examination shall be borne by the health club.

The buyer shall notify the health club of cancellation in writing, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or personal delivery, to the address of the health club as specified in the health club contract.

If the customer has executed any credit or lien agreement with the health club or its representatives or agents to pay for all or part of health club services, any such negotiable instrument executed by the buyer shall be returned to the buyer within
30 days after such cancellation.

If the club agrees to allow a consumer to cancel for any other reason not outlined in this section, upon receipt of notice of cancellation by the buyer, the health club shall refund to the buyer funds paid or accepted in payment of the contract in an
amount computed as prescribed in § 59.1-297.1.

History.
1984, c. 738; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2003, c. 344; 2004, c. 855; 2006, c. 396; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations
took effect July 15, 2004.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion
of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 344 rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855 inserted “or nurse practitioner” in the second and next-to-last sentences of subdivision A 3. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 inserted “physician assistant” in the second and fourth sentences in subdivision A 3.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439, in subdivision A 2, substituted “facility relocates” for “health spa relocates” and inserted “the health spa” near the middle of the first sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” throughout the section.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

§ 59.1-297.1.
Payment and calculation of refunds.

All refunds for cancellation of membership shall be paid within 30 days of the health club’s receipt of written notice of cancellation by the buyer and calculated by:

Dividing the contract price by the term of the contract in days;

Multiplying the number obtained in subdivision 1 by the number of days between the effective date of the contract and the date of cancellation; and

Subtracting the number obtained in subdivision 2 from the total price paid on the health club contract.

In the event of the health club going out of business, the date of cancellation shall be the date the health club ceased providing health club services at the facility.

A health club issuing a refund to a buyer under this chapter shall do so within 30 days of the health club receiving a notice of cancellation pursuant to § 59.1-297, or within 30 days of the permanent closing of the facility designated in the buyer’s
contract.

History.
2003, c. 344; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439, in subsection B, added “at the facility” to the end; and added subsection C.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section.

§ 59.1-297.2.
Automatic termination of a health club contract.

A health club contract shall be considered terminated automatically if the designated facility closes permanently and the health club does not provide a comparable alternate facility. A facility closes temporarily if it closes for a reasonable period
of time (i) for renovations to all or a portion of the facility, (ii) because the lease for the facility has been canceled, or (iii) because of a fire, or a flood or other act of God, or other cause not within the reasonable control
of the health club. If a facility closes temporarily, it shall within 14 days from the time of the temporary closing provide notice of the date it expects to reopen, which date shall be within a reasonable period of time from the time
the facility temporarily closes, to the Commissioner and shall conspicuously post such notice both within and outside each entrance to the facility.

History.
2003, c. 344; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439 rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section.

§ 59.1-298.
Notice to buyer.

A copy of the executed health club contract shall be delivered to the buyer at the time the contract is executed. All health club contracts shall (i) be in writing, (ii) state the name and physical address of the health club, (iii) be signed by the buyer,
(iv) designate the date on which the buyer actually signed the contract, (v) state the starting and expiration dates of the initial membership period, (vi) separately identify any initiation fee, (vii) either in the contract itself
or in a separate notice provided to the buyer at the time the contract is executed, notify each buyer that the buyer should attempt to resolve with the health club any complaint the buyer has with the health club, and that the Virginia
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services regulates health clubs in the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Health Club Act, and (viii) contain the provisions set forth in § 59.1-297 under a conspicuous caption:
“BUYER’S RIGHT TO CANCEL” that shall read substantially as follows:

If you wish to cancel this contract, you may cancel by making or delivering written notice to this health club. The notice must say that you do not wish to be bound by the contract and must be delivered or mailed before midnight of the third business
day after you sign this contract. The notice must be delivered or mailed to

Click to view

(Health club shall insert its name and mailing address.)

If canceled within three business days, you will be entitled to a refund of all moneys paid. You may also cancel this contract if this club goes out of business or relocates and fails to provide comparable alternate facilities within five driving miles
of the facility designated in this contract. You may also cancel if you become physically unable to use a substantial portion of the health club services for 30 or more consecutive days, and your estate may cancel in the event of your
death. You must prove you are unable to use a substantial portion of the health club services by a doctor’s, physician assistant’s, or nurse practitioner’s certificate, and the health club may also require that you submit to a physical
examination, within 30 days of the notice of cancellation, by a doctor, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner agreeable to you and the health club. If you cancel after the three business days, the health club may retain or collect
a portion of the contract price equal to the proportionate value of the services or use of facilities you have already received. Any refund due to you shall be paid within 30 days of the effective date of cancellation.

History.
1984, c. 738; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2003, c. 344; 2004, c. 855; 2006, c. 396; 2010, c. 439; 2013, c. 24; 2014, c. 459.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations
took effect July 15, 2004.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion
of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 345 rewrote the introductory paragraph, and in the form, deleted “moves or” preceding “goes out of business,” substituted “comparable alternate” for “alternative,” inserted “driving” preceding “miles,” substituted “physically
unable to use a substantial portion of the health spa services for 30 or more consecutive days” for “disabled,” substituted “you are unable to use a substantial portion of the health spa services” for “such disability,” inserted “within
30 days of the notice of cancellation,” and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855, in the last paragraph, in the fourth sentence, inserted “or nurse practitioner’s” following “by a doctor’s” and “or nurse practitioner” following “by a doctor.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 inserted “physician assistant’s” and “physician assistant” in the fourth sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439 substituted “facility” for “location” in the second paragraph of the “BUYER’S RIGHT TO CANCEL” notice.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 24 deleted “Office of Consumer Affairs” following “Agriculture and Consumer Services” in clause (vi) of the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” throughout the section; and in the introductory paragraph, inserted “state the name and physical address of the health club, (iii)” and made related changes.

§ 59.1-299.
Duration of contract.

No health club contract shall have a duration for a period longer than thirty-six months, including any renewal period; however, a health club contract may exceed 36 months provided that:

Any initiation fee does not exceed 10 times the initial monthly fee;

All payments for health club services, other than the initiation fee, are collected as monthly fees on a monthly basis;

After an initial term of not more than 12 months, either party may cancel the health club contract upon not more than 30 days’ notice; and

The monthly fee is never reduced below 80 percent of the monthly fee at the time the contract is initially executed.

History.
1984, c. 738; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 1992, c. 117; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section; in the introductory paragraph substituted “36” for “thirty-six”; in subdivision 1 substituted “10” for “ten”; in subdivision 3 substituted “12” for “twelve”
and “30” for “thirty”; and in subdivision 4 substituted “80” for “eighty.”

§ 59.1-300.
Provisions of this chapter not exclusive.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive and do not relieve the parties or the contracts subject thereto from compliance with all other applicable provisions of law.

History.
1984, c. 738.

§ 59.1-301.
Noncomplying contract voidable.

Any health club contract that does not comply with the applicable provisions of this chapter shall be voidable at the option of the buyer.

History.
1984, c. 738; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” and “that” for “which.”

§ 59.1-302.
Fraud rendering contract void.

Any health club contract entered into by the buyer upon any false or misleading information, representation, notice, or advertisement of the health club or the health club’s agents shall be void and unenforceable.

History.
1984, c. 738; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section.

§ 59.1-303.
Waiver of provisions void and unenforceable.

Any waiver by the buyer of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

History.
1984, c. 738.

§ 59.1-304.
Notice of preservation of buyers’ rights.

All health club contracts and any promissory note executed by the buyer in connection therewith shall contain the following provision on the face thereof in at least 10-point, boldface type:

NOTICE

ANY HOLDER OF THIS CONTRACT OR NOTE IS SUBJECT TO ALL CLAIMS AND DEFENSES WHICH THE DEBTOR COULD ASSERT AGAINST THE SELLER OF GOODS OR SERVICES OBTAINED WITH THE PROCEEDS HEREOF. RECOVERY HEREUNDER BY THE DEBTOR SHALL NOT EXCEED AMOUNTS PAID BY THE DEBTOR
HEREUNDER.

History.
1984, c. 738; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459, in the first paragraph, substituted “health club” for “health spa” and “10” for “ten.”

§ 59.1-305.
Prohibition against assignment of health club contract cutting off buyer’s right of action or defense against seller; conditions.

Whether or not the health club has complied with the notice requirements of § 59.1-304, any right of action or defense arising out of a health club contract which the buyer has against the health club, and which would be cut off by assignment, shall not
be cut off by assignment of the contract to any third party holder, whether or not the holder acquires the contract in good faith and for value.

History.
1984, c. 738; 2003, c. 344; 2014, c. 459.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 344 substituted “59.1-304” for “59.1-295.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section.

§ 59.1-306.
Bond or letter of credit required; exception.

Every health club, before it enters into a health club contract and accepts any moneys in excess of the prorated monthly fee for the month when the contract is initially executed plus one month’s fees or accepts any initiation fee in excess of $125, shall
file and maintain with the Commissioner, in form and substance satisfactory to him, a bond with corporate surety, from a company authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth or a letter of credit from a bank insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in the amounts indicated below:

Click to viewFor purposes of calculating the number of applicable unexpired health club contracts when determining the required amount of bond or letter of credit, health club contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2005, with a term that exceeds
13 months shall be counted as multiple health club contracts, such that the number of applicable contracts counted with respect thereto shall equal the total of the number of full years and any partial year in its term. However,
this paragraph shall not apply (i) to health club contracts that are payable only on a monthly basis and for which the initiation fee is no more than $250 or (ii) if the number of the health club’s contracts in effect with
a term that exceeds 13 months is less than 10 percent of the total of its health club contracts.The number of applicable unexpired contracts shall be separately calculated for each facility.A health club shall file a separate
bond or letter of credit with respect to each separate facility, even though the separate facilities are owned or operated by the same health club.However, no health club shall be required to file with the Commissioner bonds
or letters of credit in excess of $300,000. If the $300,000 limit is applicable, then the bonds or letters of credit filed by the health club shall apply to all facilities owned or operated by the same health club.

A health club may sell health club contracts of up to 36 months’ duration for a facility for which a health club has not filed a bond or letter of credit so long as the amount of payment actually charged, due or received under the health club contracts
each month by the health club or any holder thereunder does not exceed the monthly fee calculated pursuant to the definition thereof in § 59.1-296, with the exception that the payment actually charged may include a maximum initiation
fee of $125 for health club contracts of 13 months or more in duration.

Number of Amount of bond applicable contracts or letter of credit 0 to 250 $10,000 251 to 500 $20,000 501 to 750 $30,000 751 to 1000 $40,000 1001 to 1250 $50,000 1251 to 1500 $60,000 1501 to 1750 $70,000 1751 to 2000 $80,000 2001 or more $100,000

History.
1984, c. 738; 1985, c. 585; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 1992, c. 117; 2004, c. 988; 2010, c. 439; 2014, c. 459.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 988 twice substituted “$125” for “seventy-five dollars”; inserted the present second paragraph in subsection A; and in subsection B, substituted “36” for “thirty-six” and “13” for “twelve.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 439, in subsection A, in the third paragraph, substituted “facility” for “location where health spa services are offered,” in the fourth paragraph, substituted “a health spa shall file” for “each separate location where health
spa services are offered shall be considered a separate health spa and shall file,” “to each separate facility” for “thereto,” “facilities” for “locations,” and “health spa” for “owner,” in the fifth paragraph, substituted “health
spa” for “owner,” “the health spa” for “such owner,” “facilities” for “health spas,” and “same health spa” for “same owner”; and in subsection B, substituted “health spa may sell” for “health spa which has not filed a bond or letter
of credit may nevertheless,” inserted “for a facility for which a health spa has not filed a bond or letter of credit” and “under the health spa contracts,” and substituted “thereunder” for “of its health spa contracts.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “health club” for “health spa” throughout the section and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 59.1-307.
Bond or letter of credit; persons protected.

The bond or letter of credit required by § 59.1-306 shall be in favor of the Commonwealth for the benefit of (i) any buyer injured by having paid money for health club services in a facility that fails to open by the date provided by the contract, which
date shall not be in excess of 12 months from the signing of the contract; (ii) any buyer injured by having paid money for health club services in a facility which goes out of business prior to the expiration of the buyer’s health
club contract; or (iii) any buyer injured as a result of a violation of this chapter.

The aggregate liability of the bond or letter of credit to all persons for all breaches of the conditions of the bond or letter of credit shall in no event exceed the amount of the bond or letter of credit. The bond or letter of credit shall not be cancelled
or terminated except with the consent of the Commissioner.

History.
1984, c. 738; 1987, c. 547; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” throughout the subsection; and in subsection A, substituted “that” for “which” and “12” for “twelve.”